North Dakota, session 69, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 16.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Required location of district endorsing caucus or meeting of a district committee or
district executive committee.
1. A district organization entitled to endorse candidates under section 16.1 - 03 - 21 may
hold an endorsing caucus to endorse candidates for placement on a primary election
ballot under the district organization's rules and bylaws. The endorsing caucus or any
other meeting of the district committee or district executive committee must be held
within the geographical boundaries of the district organization's legislative district as
provided under section 54 - 03 - 01.14 .
2. If a district organization's legislative district is partially located within the boundaries of
an incorporated city in which multiple legislative districts are located, the district
organization shall hold the caucus or any other meeting of the district committee or
district executive committee within the geographical boundaries of that city.
Page No. 1 25.1045.02000